Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-4,124.01
Tax credit gasoline; certain purchases; repeal of section, effect.

The repeal of section 66-4,124 by Laws 2004, LB 983, applies to motor fuels purchased during any tax year ending or deemed to end on or after January 1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 24.